cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/ml_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Malayalam

// A means vowel letters (not vowel signs)
// B means a combining vowel sign or a virama


.replace
൦	0	// Convert Malayalam numbers
൧	1
൨	2
൩	3
൪	4
൫	5
൬	6
൭	7
൮	8
൯	9
ോ	ോ 
ൊ	ൊ
ൌ	ൌ



.group ക
	ക	ka
	ക (B	k

.group ഖ
	ഖ	kha
	ഖ (B	kh

.group ഗ
	ഗ	ga
	ഗ (B	g

.group ഘ
	ഘ	gha
	ഘ (B	gh

.group ങ
	ങ	Na
	ങ (B	N

.group ച
	ച	ca
	ച (B	c

.group ഛ
	ഛ	cha
	ഛ (B	ch

.group ജ
	ജ	Ja
	ജ (B	J

.group ഝ
	ഝ	Jha
	ഝ (B	Jh

.group ഞ
	ഞ	n^a
	ഞ (B	n^

.group ട
	ട	t.a
	ട (B	t.

.group ഠ
	ഠ	th.a
	ഠ (B	th.

.group ഡ
	ഡ	d.a
	ഡ (B	d.

.group ഢ
	ഢ	dh.a
	ഢ (B	dh.

.group ണ
	ണ	n.a
	ണ (B	n.

.group ത
	ത	ta
	ത (B	t

.group ഥ
	ഥ	tha
	ഥ (B	th

.group ദ
	ദ	da
	ദ (B	d

.group ധ
	ധ	dha
	ധ (B	dh

.group ന
	ന	na
	ന (B	n

.group പ
	പ	pa
	പ (B	p

.group ഫ
	ഫ	pha
	ഫ (B	p

_പ്രൊ) ഫ (സര്	fa


.group ബ
	ബ	ba
	ബ (B	b

.group ഭ
	ഭ	bha
	ഭ (B	bh

.group മ
	മ	ma
	മ (B	m

.group യ
	യ	ja
	യ (B	j

.group ര
	ര	ra
	ര (B	r

.group റ
	റ	R2a
	റ (B	R2
     ന്) റ	d#
	റ്റ	t.t.   // ?? R2R2 = t.t.

.group ല
	ല	la
	ല (B	l

.group ള
	ള	l.a
	ള (B	l.

.group ഴ    // retroflex [r.] ?
	ഴ	r.a
	ഴ (B	r.

.group വ
	വ	va
	വ (B	v

.group ശ
	ശ	S;a
	ശ (B	S;

.group ഷ
	ഷ	s.a
	ഷ (B	s.

.group സ
	സ	sa
	സ (B	s

.group ഹ
	ഹ	ha
	ഹ (B	h


// chillu consonants
.group ൺ
	ൺ	n.

.group ൻ
	ൻ	n

.group ർ
	ർ	r

.group ൽ
	ൽ	l

.group ൾ
	ൾ	l.

.group ൿ
	ൿ	k


.group 0xe0b4   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b4]

	ഽ	// avagraha

	ം	m	// anusvara (this should nasalize the vowel)

	ഃ	h	// visarga

	അ	a

	ആ	a:

	ഇ	i

	ഈ	i:

	ഉ	u

	ഊ	u:

	ഋ	Ry

	എ	e
     _) എ	;e

	ഏ	e:
     _) ഏ	;e:

	ഐ	aI

	ഒ	o

	ഓ	o:

	ഔ	aU

// combining vowel signs

	ാ	a:

	ി	i
	ി  (ല്K     I

.group 0xe0b5   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b5]

	ീ	i:

	ു	u

	ൂ	u:

	ൃ	r-

	ൄ	r-:

	െ	e

	േ	e:

	ൈ	aI

	ൊ	o

	ോ	o:

	ൌ	aU
	ൗ	aU   // au length mark, treat at [aU] ?

	്	// virama
	ൎ	// chillu-virama (unofficial)
	്്	// espeak uses double-virama for "virama + U+200d" (zero-width joiner), to indicate a chillu character
	്  (_   y //   epenthetic vowel at end of word

	ൠ	Ry:

	ൡ	ly:



.group 0xe0a4  // devanagari
	\340\244  _^_HI  // switch to hindi voice
.group 0xe0a5  // devanagari
	\340\245  _^_HI


.group
	$	do:l.ar
